Delaware, session 153, HB229.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Â§ 5705, Title 25 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 5705. Service and filing of notice. (a) The notice of hearing and the complaint shall be served at least 5 days and not more than 30 90 days before the time at which the complaint is to be heard.